Utah statutes.
16-10a-810.   Vacancy on board.
(1)  Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, if a vacancy
occurs on a board of directors, including a vacancy resulting from an increase
in the number of directors:
(a)  the shareholders may fill the vacancy;
(b)  the board of directors may fill the vacancy; or
(c)  if the directors remaining in office constitute fewer than a quorum of
the board, they may fill the vacancy by the affirmative vote of a majority of
all the directors remaining in office.
(2)  Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, if the vacant
office was held or is to be held by a director elected by a voting group of
shareholders:
(a)  if one or more of the other directors elected by the same voting group
are serving, only they are entitled to vote to fill the vacancy if it is
filled by the directors; and
(b)  only the holders of shares of that voting group are entitled to vote to
fill the vacancy if it is filled by the shareholders.
(3)  A vacancy that will occur at a specific later date, by reason of a
resignation effective at a later date under Section 16-10a-807 or otherwise,
may be filled before the vacancy occurs, but the new director may not take
office until the vacancy occurs.
